North Dakota, session 69, SB2160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-52.1-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Board" means the public employees retirement board.
2. "Carrier" means:
a. For the hospitalhealth insurance benefits coverage, an insurance company authorized to
do business in the state, or a nonprofit hospital service association, or a prepaid group
practice hospital or medical care plan authorized to do business in the state, or the state
if a self-insurance health plan is used for providing hospital or medical benefits coverage.
b. For the medical benefits coverage, an insurance company authorized to do business in
the state, or a nonprofit medical service association, or a prepaid group practice medical
care plan authorized to do business in the state, or the state if a self-insurance health
plan is used for providing medical benefits coverage.
c. For the life insurance benefits coverage, an insurance company authorized to do
business in the state.
3. "Department, board, or agency" means the departmentsa department, boardsboard,
agenciesagency, or associationsassociation of this state. The term includes the state's
charitable, penal, and higher educational institutions; the Bank of North Dakota; the state mill
and elevator association; and counties, cities, district health units, and school districts.
4. "Eligible employee" means every permanent employee who is employed by a governmental
unit, as that term is defined in section 54-52-01. "Eligible employee" includes members of the
legislative assembly, judges of the supreme court, paid members of state or political
subdivision boards, commissions, or associations, full-time employees of political subdivisions,
elective state officers as defined by section 54-06-01, and disabled permanent employees
who are receiving compensation from the North Dakota workforce safety and insurance fund.
As used in this subsection, "permanent employee" means one whose services are not limited
in duration, who is filling an approved and regularly funded position in a governmental unit,
and who is employed at least seventeen and one-half hours per week and at least five months
each year or for those first employed after August 1, 2003, is employed at least twenty hours
per week and at least twenty weeks each year of employment. For purposes of sections
54-52.1-04.1, 54-52.1-04.7, 54-52.1-04.8, and 54-52.1-11, "eligible employee" includes retired
and terminated employees who remain eligible to participate in the uniform group insurance
program pursuant to applicable state or federal law.

S. B. NO. 2160 - PAGE 2
5. "Health insurance benefits coverage" means hospital:
a. A nongrandfathered health plan sponsored by a large employer which meets the
applicable requirements of 42 U.S.C. chapter 6A, subchapter XXV, without regard to 42
U.S.C. 18011, including benefits provided under the uniform group insurance program's
grandfathered preferred provider organization plan;
b. Hospital benefits coverage or medical;
c. Medical benefits coverage,; or both
d. Both hospital and medical benefits coverage.
6. "Health maintenance organization" means an organization certified to establish and operate a
health maintenance organization in compliance with chapter 26.1-18.1.
7. "Hospital benefits coverage" means a plan that either provides coverage for, or pays, or
reimburses expenses for hospital services incurred in accordance with the uniform contract.
8. "Life insurance benefits coverage" means a plan that provides both term life insurance and
accidental death and dismemberment insurance in amounts determined by the board, with a
minimum of one thousand dollars provided for the term life insurance portion of the coverage.
9. "Medical benefits coverage" means a plan that either provides coverage for, or pays, or
reimburses expenses for medical services in accordance with the uniform contract.
10. "Member contribution" means the payment by the member into the retiree health benefits fund
pursuant to sections 54-52-02.9 and 54-52-17.4.
11. "Member's account balance" means the member's contributions plus interest at the rate set by
the board.
12. "Nongrandfathered health plan" means a plan that does not qualify as a grandfathered plan
under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act [Pub. L. 111-148], as amended by the
Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 [Pub. L. 111 - 152] .
13. "Self-insurance health plan" means a plan of self-insurance providing health insurance
benefits coverage under section 54-52.1-04.2.
13.14. "Temporary employee" means a governmental unit employee who is not filling an approved
and regularly funded position in an eligible governmental unit and whose services may or may
not be limited in duration.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-52.1-02. Uniform group insurance program created - Formation into subgroups.
In order to promote the economy and efficiency of employment in the state's service, reduce
personnel turnover, and offer an incentive to high-grade individuals to enter and remain in the service of
state employment, there is created a uniform group insurance program.
1. The uniform group insurance program must be:
a. Be composed of eligible and retired employees and be formed to provide hospital
benefits coverage, medical benefits coverage,;
b. Except as provided in subsection 2 of section 54-52.1-03.1, provide coverage as defined
in subdivision a of subsection 5 of section 54-52.1-01; and

S. B. NO. 2160 - PAGE 3
c. Provide life insurance benefits coverage in the manner set forth in this chapter.
2. The board may divide the uniform group may be divided into the following subgroups at the
discretion of the board:
1. Medical and hospital
a. Health insurance benefits coverage group consisting of active eligible employees and
retired employees not eligible for Medicare, except for employees who first retire after
July 1, 2015, and are not eligible for Medicare on their retirement. In determining
premiums for coverage under this subsectionsubdivision for retired employees not
eligible for Medicare, the rate for a non-Medicare retiree single plan is one hundred fifty
percent of the active member single plan rate, the rate for a non-Medicare retiree family
plan of two people is twice the non-Medicare retiree single plan rate, and the rate for a
non-Medicare retiree family plan of three or more persons is two and one-half times the
non-Medicare retiree single plan rate.
2. b. In addition to the coverage provided in subsection 1 subdivision a , another coverage
option may be provided for retired employees not eligible for Medicare, except for
employees who first retire after July 1, 2015, and are not eligible for Medicare on their
retirement, provided the option does not increase the implicit subsidy as determined by
the governmental accounting standards board's other postemployment benefit reporting
procedure. In offering this additional option, the board may have an open enrollment but
thereafter enrollment for this option must be as specified in section 54-52.1-03.
3. c. Retired Medicare-eligible employee group medical and hospitalhealth insurance benefits
coverage.
4. d. Active eligible employee life insurance benefits coverage.
5. e. Retired employee life insurance benefits coverage.
6. f. Terminated employee continuation group medical and hospitalhealth insurance benefits
coverage.
7. g. Terminated employee conversion group medical and hospitalhealth insurance benefits
coverage.
8. h. Dental benefits coverage.
9. i. Vision benefits coverage.
10. j. Long-term care benefits coverage.
11. k. Employee assistance benefits coverage.
12. l. Prescription drug coverage.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52.1-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
54-52.1-03.1. Certain political subdivisions authorized to join uniform group insurance
program - Employer contribution.
1. If eligible under federal law, a political subdivision may extend the benefits of the uniform
group insurance program under this chapter to its permanent employees, subject to minimum
requirements established by the board and aas follows:

S. B. NO. 2160 - PAGE 4
a. A minimum period of participation of sixty months. If the political subdivision withdraws
from participation in the uniform group insurance program, before completing sixty
months of participation, unless federal or state laws or rules are modified or interpreted in
a way that makes participation by the political subdivision in the uniform group insurance
program no longer allowable or appropriate, the political subdivision shall make payment
to the board in an amount equal to any expenses incurred in the uniform group insurance
program that exceed income received on behalf of the political subdivision's employees
as determined under rules adopted by the board.
b. The Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, and district health units required to
participate in the public employees retirement system under section 54-52-02, shall
participate in the uniform group insurance program under the same terms and
conditionspremium structures as state agencies.
c. A retiree who has accepted a retirement allowance from a participating political
subdivision's retirement plan may elect to participate in the uniform group under this
chapter without meeting minimum requirements at age sixty-five, when the employee's
spouse reaches age sixty-five, upon the receipt of a benefit, when the political
subdivision joins the uniform group insurance plan if the retiree was a member of the
former plan, or when the spouse terminates employment. If a retiree or surviving spouse
does not elect to participate at the times specified in this sectionsubdivision, the retiree or
surviving spouse must meet the minimum requirements established by the board.
d. Each retiree or surviving spouse shall pay directly to the board the premiums in effect for
the coverage then being provided. The board may require documentation that the retiree
has accepted a retirement allowance from an eligible retirement plan other than the
public employees retirement system.
2. For purposes of this section, the uniform group insurance program must provide health
insurance benefits coverage as defined in section 54 - 52.1 - 01 .
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET - HEALTH
INSURANCE PREMIUM POOL. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the
state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,442,991, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, and from other funds derived from federal funds and special funds, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $1,851,509, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the office of
management and budget for the purpose of a health insurance premium pool, which the office of
management and budget shall use to distribute appropriation authority to state agencies for paying a
portion of health insurance premium cost increases related to this Act, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the
public employees retirement system use an estimated amount of $3,294,500, or so much of the sum as
may be necessary, from the health insurance reserve fund established in section 54-52.1-06 for a
portion of the state employer share of any increase in premiums for health benefits resulting from the
provisions of this Act for the period beginning with the effective date of this Act and ending June 30,
2027.
SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 through 3 of this Act become effective on January 1,
2027.

S. B. NO. 2160 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2160.
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 8 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 55 Nays 37 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State

S. B. NO. 2160 - PAGE 6
Honorable Michael Howe
Secretary of State
Bismarck, North Dakota
I certify this Act, Senate Bill No. 2160, together with the objections of Governor Armstrong, was
returned to the Senate, being the body in which it originated, on April 29, 2025; that the objections of
the Governor were entered upon the Journal on April 29, 2025; that the Bill was taken up for
reconsideration; that the motion for reconsideration failed on May 1, 2025, at 8:25 a.m.; and the roll was
called and the Bill failed to pass, with less than two-thirds of the members-elect voting in the affirmative.
Vote: Yeas 31
Nays 15
Absent and
not voting 1
____________________________
President of the Senate
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate